District of Columbia statutes.
22-3014

Second degree sexual abuse of a ward, patient, client, or prisoner.

Any staff member, employee, contract employee, consultant, or volunteer at a hospital, treatment facility, detention or correctional facility, group home, or other institution; anyone who is an ambulance driver or attendant, a bus driver or attendant, or person who participates in the transportation of a ward, patient, client, or prisoner to and from such institutions; or any official custodian of a ward, patient, client, or prisoner, who engages in a sexual contact with a ward, patient, client, or prisoner, or causes a ward, patient, client, or prisoner, to engage in or submit to a sexual contact shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years or fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 213, 42 DCR 53
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(h), 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(p), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 23-113 and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-4114.
D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $50,000”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(h) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(h) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(h) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(h) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(p) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).